District of Columbia statutes.
29-808.04

Pleading.

In a derivative action under § 29-808.02, the complaint shall state with particularity:

(1)

The date and content of plaintiff’s demand and the response to the demand by the managers or other members; or

(2)

If a demand has not been made, the reasons a demand under § 29-808.02(1) would be futile.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 904 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).